North Dakota, session 69, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 11-09.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Sales, use, and gross receipts taxes - Rate restriction .
A home rule county may not impose a new or extend or increase any existing home rule
sales, use, or gross receipts tax after June 30, 2025, at a rate exceeding three percent. Sales
and use taxes or gross receipts taxes levied under this chapter before July 1, 2025, at a rate
exceeding three percent may continue to be imposed at the rate in effect on June 30, 2025 ,
until the expiration of the period for which the tax rate in excess of three percent was approved
but may not thereafter be reimposed at a rate exceeding three percent.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 40-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Sales, use, and gross receipts taxes - Rate restriction .
A home rule city may not impose a new or extend or increase any existing home rule sales,
use, or gross receipts tax after June 30, 2025, at a rate exceeding three percent. Sales and use
taxes or gross receipts taxes levied under this chapter before July 1, 2025, at a rate exceeding
three percent may continue to be imposed at the rate in effect on June 30, 2025, until the
expiration of the period for which the tax rate in excess of three percent was approved but may
not thereafter be reimposed at a rate exceeding three percent.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after
June 30, 2025.
Page No. 1 25.1163.01000